New York, session 2025-2026, A373.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "reputa- 2 tional insight and oversight transparency act" or "RIOT act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds, (a) in the aftermath 4 of the January 6th storming of the United States Capitol, that groups 5 who had supported lawmakers in overturning the presidential election 6 results had financial backing from private equity firms and big corpo- 7 rations, and (b) that public pension investments through the New York 8 State Common Retirement Fund and analogous pension funds in New York 9 state municipalities must account for reputational risk for the welfare 10 of New York state public employees. 11 § 3. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding a new 12 section 177-f to read as follows: 13 § 177-f. Restriction of certain investments in firms. 1. Firms in 14 which the fund invests shall not pledge any direct corporate contrib- 15 utions to independent expenditure-only political action committees 16 (super PACs), tax-exempt political organizations defined under section 17 527 of the Internal Revenue Code or tax-exempt organizations defined 18 under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. 19 2. Senior executives at such firms are prohibited from making individ- 20 ual contributions in excess of ten thousand dollars to the entities 21 listed in subdivision one of this section. 22 3. Senior executives at such firms who make individual contributions 23 to the entities listed in subdivision one of this section at or below 24 ten thousand dollars shall disclose such contributions to either the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00188-01-5 A. 373 2 1 department of audit and control, the office of the New York state comp- 2 troller or the office of the New York city comptroller, whichever 3 department or office oversees the fund. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.